Maine, session 132, LD972.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §8401, sub-§1, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 679, §11, is
repealed.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §8401, sub-§1, ¶M-1 is enacted to read:
M-1. Regional School Unit No. 37 (Addison, Columbia, Columbia Falls, Harrington
and Milbridge) for the career and technical education center located in Machias;